Illinois, session 104th, HB5729.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $27,319,600, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 6Assistance Fund to the Illinois Mathematics and Science 7Academy to meet its ordinary and contingent expenses for the 8fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 9    Section 10. The amount of $5,925,000, or so much of that 10amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the IMSA 11Income Fund to the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy to 12meet its ordinary and contingent expenses for the fiscal year 13ending June 30, 2027. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.